Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202081-3454
Technical submissions by professional engineer; affix seal and signature; conditions.

(1) A professional engineer shall not affix his or her seal and signature to technical submissions that are subject to the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act unless the technical submissions were:

(a) Prepared entirely by the professional engineer;

(b) Prepared entirely under the direct supervision of the professional engineer; or

(c) Prepared partially by others if the professional engineer has reviewed and integrated the work into his or her own technical submissions.

(2) A professional engineer may affix his or her seal to technical submissions not subject to the act if the professional engineer has reviewed or adapted in whole or in part such submissions and integrated them into his or her work.

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 54;

Laws 2013, LB7, § 4;

Laws 2015, LB23, § 49.